California, session 20252026, SB651.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:3. It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the provisions of this code are enacted in the exercise of the power of this state for the purposes of promoting and protecting the agricultural industry of the state and for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare. In all civil actions the provisions of this code shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of to accomplish these purposes and for the accomplishment of to accomplish the purposes of the several divisions of this code, and in criminal actions the rule of construction set forth in Section 4 of the Penal Code shall be the rule of construction for this code.